Hawaii statutes.
§432D-13 Examinations. (a) The
commissioner may examine the affairs of any health maintenance organization or
of any providers with whom such organization has contracts, agreements, or
other arrangements as often as is reasonably necessary for the protection of
the interests of the people of this State but shall make such examination not
fewer than once every five years for health maintenance organizations domiciled
in this State.

(b) Every health maintenance organization and
provider shall submit its books and records for examination and in every way
facilitate the completion of the examination. In the event a health
maintenance organization or the provider fails to comply with the directions of
the commissioner, the commissioner may examine the affiliates of the health
maintenance organization or provider to obtain the information. For the
purpose of examinations, the commissioner may administer oaths to, and examine
the officers and agents of, the health maintenance organization and the
principals of providers concerning their business.

(c) The cost of examinations under this
section shall be assessed against the health maintenance organization being
examined and remitted to the commissioner for deposit into the compliance
resolution fund.

(d) In lieu of such examination, the
commissioner may accept the report of an examination made by the commissioner
or director of the department of health of another state. [L 1995, c 179, pt of
§1; am L 2004, c 122, §91; am L 2012, c 251, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next